Utah statutes.
75-7-502.   Spendthrift provisions for beneficiaries other than the settlor.
(1)  A spendthrift provision for a beneficiary other than the settlor is valid
only if it restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a
beneficiary's interest, even if the beneficiary is the trustee or cotrustee of
the trust.
(2)  A term of a trust providing that the interest of a beneficiary other than
the settlor is held subject to a "spendthrift trust," or words of similar
import, is sufficient to restrain both voluntary and involuntary transfer of
the beneficiary's interest.
(3)  A beneficiary may not transfer an interest in a trust in violation of a
valid spendthrift provision and, except as otherwise provided in this part, a
creditor or assignee of the beneficiary may not reach the interest or a
distribution by the trustee before its receipt by the beneficiary.
